Massachusetts, session 194th, S1717.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (a) of section 184A of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 11, the words “and 13 members
who shall be appointed by the governor” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
“and 15 members who shall be appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be nominated
by the president of the Massachusetts Organization of State Engineers and Scientists, 1 of whom
shall be nominated by the union representing the Boston Police Crime Laboratory Unit".
of 1